Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Tobacco Plants

250.750.
Definitions for KRS 250.750 to 250.790. [Repealed.]

250.755.
Scope of KRS 250.750 to 250.790. [Repealed.]

250.760.
Initial seed source — Labeling requirements. [Repealed.]

250.765.
Permits — Registration and inspection fees — Registration as a dealer. [Repealed.]

250.770.
Recordkeeping requirements. [Repealed.]

250.775.
Unlawful acts. [Repealed.]

250.780.
Director’s duties and authority for enforcement — Authority to promulgate administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

250.785.
Proceedings against violators of KRS 250.750 to 250.790. [Repealed.]

250.790.
Penalty for violations of KRS 250.750 to 250.790. [Repealed.]